New York, session 2025-2026, S7798.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1 of a chapter of the laws of 2025, enacting the 2 aid to localities budget, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 3 3003-D and A. 3003-D, is amended by repealing the items hereinbelow set 4 forth in brackets and by adding to such section the other items under- 5 scored in this section. 6 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 7 AID TO LOCALITIES 2025-26 8 UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES AND CIVIC ENGAGEMENT PROGRAM ...... 90,000,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 Local Assistance Account - 10000 12 Pursuant to the following sub-schedule, and 13 notwithstanding any provisions to the 14 contrary contained in section 163 and 15 section 112 of the state finance law or 16 any other law, funding from this appropri- 17 ation shall be made available for services 18 and expenses of the following community 19 nonprofit organizations and civic organ- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12553-10-5 S. 7798 2 1 izations, for purposes including but not 2 limited to, supporting community based 3 programming, crisis intervention initi- 4 atives, housing assistance, economic 5 development, workforce training, educa- 6 tional initiatives and healthcare services 7 in underserved communities .................. 90,000,000 8 sub-schedule 9 Asian American [Foundation] 10 Federation .................... 15,000,000 11 Coalition for Asian American 12 Children and Families ......... 15,000,000 13 New York Urban League ........... 10,000,000 14 United Way of Greater New York .. 10,000,000 15 Local Initiatives Support 16 Corporation ................... 10,000,000 17 Catholic Charities Community 18 Services of the Archdiocese 19 of New York ................... 15,000,000 20 Fund for the City of New York ... 15,000,000 21 -------------- 22 Total of sub-schedule ......... 90,000,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal .................. 90,000,000 25 -------------- 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; and shall be deemed to 27 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2025.